Utah statutes.
13-11-8.   Powers of enforcing authority.
(1) The enforcing authority may conduct research, hold public hearings, make
inquiries, and publish studies relating to consumer sales acts or practices.
(2)  The enforcing authority shall adopt substantive rules that prohibit with
specificity acts or practices that violate Section 13-11-4 and appropriate
procedural rules.
